Washington statutes.
RCW 35.13.130

Direct petition method—Petition—Signers—Content.

A petition for annexation of an area contiguous to a city or town may be made in writing addressed to and filed with the legislative body of the municipality to which annexation is desired. Except where all the property sought to be annexed is property of a school district, and the school directors thereof file the petition for annexation as in RCW 28A.335.110 authorized, the petition must be signed by the owners of not less than sixty percent in value according to the assessed valuation for general taxation of the property for which annexation is petitioned: PROVIDED, That in cities and towns with populations greater than one hundred sixty thousand located east of the Cascade mountains, the owner of tax exempt property may sign an annexation petition and have the tax exempt property annexed into the city or town, but the value of the tax exempt property shall not be used in calculating the sufficiency of the required property owner signatures unless only tax exempt property is proposed to be annexed into the city or town. The petition shall set forth a description of the property according to government legal subdivisions or legal plats which is in compliance with RCW 35.02.170, and shall be accompanied by a plat which outlines the boundaries of the property sought to be annexed. If the legislative body has required the assumption of all or of any portion of city or town indebtedness by the area annexed, and/or the adoption of a comprehensive plan for the area to be annexed, these facts, together with a quotation of the minute entry of such requirement or requirements shall be set forth in the petition.

[ 2009 c 60 s 3; 1990 c 33 s 566; 1981 c 66 s 1; 1975 1st ex.s. c 220 s 8; 1973 1st ex.s. c 164 s 12; 1971 c 69 s 2; 1965 ex.s. c 88 s 11; 1965 c 7 s 35.13.130. Prior: 1961 c 282 s 19; 1945 c 128 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 8908-12.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Statutory references—Severability—1990 c 33: See RCW 28A.900.100 through 28A.900.102.

Severability—1981 c 66: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1981 c 66 s 2.]

Legislative finding, intent—1975 1st ex.s. c 220: See note following RCW 35.02.170.

Severability—1971 c 69: See note following RCW 35.13.125.